Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Chapter 30

Modified City Manager-Council Charter—Adoption or Surrender

6-30-101. Alternative method of incorporation provided.

An alternative method whereby unincorporated territory may become an incorporated city is provided by chapters 30-36 of this title.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 1.01; modified; T.C.A., § 6-3001.

Compiler's Notes. Public Acts 1961, chapter 293, ratified all prior adoptions of chapters 30 through 36 of title 6 by any incorporated city or town, one of which was Union City, or by residents of an unincorporated territory, and provided that such chapters should be the complete charter of such city or town substituting for the existing charter at time of adoption.

Cross-References. City manager commission charter, title 6, chs. 18-22.

Incorporation under mayor-aldermanic charter, title 6, chs. 1-4.

Law Reviews.

Two Claims, Two Keys—Overcoming Tennessee's Dual-Majority Voting Mechanism to Facilitate Consolidation Between Memphis City and Shelby County (D. Eric Setterlund), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 933 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Electronic signatures on petitions for municipal formation and annexation. OAG 12-80, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (8/2/12).

6-30-102. Definitions — Chapters 30-36.

As used in chapters 30-36 of this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

“City” means any city or territory to be incorporated that may adopt chapters 30-36 of this title;

“County” means the county in which any such city or territory to be incorporated under chapters 30-36 of this title is located, or in which the major portion of the population of any such city or territory to be incorporated is located as indicated by the last federal census; and

“This charter” refers to chapters 30-36 of this title.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 1.02; 1959, ch. 139, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3002.

6-30-103. Right to incorporate under modified city manager-council charter.

The residents of any unincorporated territory that it is desired to incorporate shall have the right to adopt chapters 30-36 of this title in the manner provided in these chapters; and thereafter such territory shall be and become incorporated and be governed as set forth in these chapters. No unincorporated territory shall be incorporated under chapters 30-36 of this title unless such territory contains not less than five thousand (5,000) persons, who shall be actual residents of the territory.

No unincorporated territory shall be incorporated within three (3) miles of an existing municipality or within five (5) miles of an existing municipality of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more in population, according to the latest census certified by the department of economic and community development. “Existing municipality” and “existing municipality of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more in population” do not include any county with a metropolitan form of government with a population of one hundred thousand (100,000) or more, according to the latest census certified by the department of economic and community development.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) or (b) to the contrary, a territory may be incorporated if the following conditions are fulfilled:

The territory contains two hundred twenty-five (225) residents or more;

The territory is composed of property that is one thousand six hundred feet (1,600') or more above sea level on the western border of the territory and contiguous with a county boundary on the eastern border of the territory;

The territory is located within an area that is bordered on the west, north and east by the Tennessee River and on the south by the border between Tennessee and another state; and

The territory is located within a metropolitan statistical area.

Notwithstanding subsections (a)-(c) to the contrary, a territory may be incorporated that meets the following conditions:

The territory contains three hundred (300) residents or more;

The territory's western boundary is contiguous with the western boundary of the county in which it is located;

The territory is located within an area bordered on the north by the Loosahatchie River and on the south by the Wolf River;

The territory's eastern boundary is approximately parallel with the western boundary, but in no place is more than eight (8) miles from the western boundary; and

The territory is located within a metropolitan statistical area.

Notwithstanding the requirements of § 6-30-106, or any other law to the contrary, the petition for incorporation of the territory described in this section may consist of a letter from a resident of the territory desiring to incorporate to the county election commission requesting that the question of incorporating the territory be placed on the ballot. The letter shall describe the exact boundaries of the proposed municipality, indicate the name of the proposed municipality, and indicate under which charter the territory desires to incorporate. The letter shall be treated as a petition meeting all the requirements of law.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 1.03; T.C.A., § 6-3003; Acts 1993, ch. 320, § 7; 1996, ch. 666, §§ 3, 6.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1993, ch. 320, § 9 provided that the amendments by that act shall have no effect on a petition for incorporation filed with the county election commissioner before July 1, 1993. It further provided that if litigation concerning the validity of a municipal charter is pending in either a trial or appellate court on July 1, 1993, then neither the amendments by that act nor title 6, chapter 51 shall be construed or applied in any manner that would prevent or restrict the territory described within such charter from once again incorporating as a municipality, should the court rule against the validity of the charter.

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of restrictions on municipal incorporation, OAG 95-114, 1995 Tenn. AG LEXIS 127 (11/21/95).

6-30-104. Procedure for adoption or surrender of charter.

The adoption or surrender of chapters 30-36 of this title shall be accomplished in the same manner as is provided in §§ 6-18-104(c), 6-18-105 — 6-18-113 and 6-30-106 for the adoption or surrender of the uniform city manager-commission charter; provided, that where those sections refer to chapters 18-22 of this title “chapters 30-36 of this title” shall be substituted; that where the uniform city manager-commission charter is referred to “modified city manager-council charter” shall be substituted; and that where commissioners are referred to, “council members” shall be substituted.

No unincorporated territory shall be allowed to hold a referendum on the question of whether or not to incorporate under this charter until a plan of services is documented, setting forth the identification and projected timing of municipal services proposed to be provided and the revenue from purely local sources to be payable annually. The plan of services shall be attached to the petition to incorporate when such petition is filed with the county election commission. The plan of services shall include, but not be limited to, police protection, fire protection, water service, sanitary sewage system, solid waste disposal, road and street construction and repair, recreational facilities, a proposed five-year operational budget, including projected revenues and expenditures, and the revenue from purely local sources to be payable annually. Municipalities that are first incorporated on or after July 1, 1993, that produce no local own-source revenues in any fiscal year, shall not receive any state-shared revenues during the next fiscal year.

Prior to filing the petition with the county election commission, a public hearing on the referendum on the question of whether or not to incorporate under this charter and plan of services shall be conducted. The public hearing shall be advertised in a newspaper of general circulation for two (2) consecutive weeks.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 1.04; 1959, ch. 139, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-3004; Acts 1983, ch. 33, § 6; 1993, ch. 320, § 8.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1993, ch. 320, § 9 provided that the amendments by that act shall have no effect on a petition for incorporation filed with the county election commissioner before July 1, 1993. It further provided that if litigation concerning the validity of a municipal charter is pending in either a trial or appellate court on July 1, 1993, then neither the amendments by that act nor chapter 51 of this title shall be construed or applied in any manner that would prevent or restrict the territory described within such charter from once again incorporating as a municipality, should the court rule against the validity of the charter.

6-30-105. Construction of charter.

In the construction of any portion of this charter whose meaning or application is in dispute, it is intended that its phraseology shall be liberally construed to effect the substantial objects of chapters 30-36 of this title.

Acts 1957, ch. 238, § 9.01; T.C.A., § 6-3005.

6-30-106. Election to adopt city manager form — Publication of notice — Applicability.

An election for the purpose of determining whether or not chapters 30-36 of this title shall become effective for any city shall be called by the county election commission or, if the area is in two (2) or more counties, jointly by the county election commissions of the affected counties, upon the petition in writing of twenty percent (20%) of the number of registered voters of the city or territory voting at the last general election, which petition shall state therein the proposed corporate name and shall designate therein in a sufficient manner the boundaries of the proposed municipal corporation, which may be done by a general reference to the boundaries then existing if there is one, and the boundaries of the councilmanic districts, or shall have attached thereto a map of the area to be incorporated on which the councilmanic districts are shown.

The county election commission shall, in addition to all other notices required by law, publish one (1) notice of the election in a newspaper of general circulation within the territory of the city or of the proposed city and post the notice in at least ten (10) places in the territory.

Except for the provisions of chapters 30-36 of this title that are adopted by reference in other municipal charters, chapters 30-36 of this title apply only to those cities that have adopted chapters 30-36 of this title by referendum as authorized by law.

Acts 1959, ch. 138, § 1; 1963, ch. 388, § 1; 1972, ch. 740, § 4(48); T.C.A., § 6-3006; Acts 1995, ch. 13, § 14; 1997, ch. 98, § 6.

Code Commission Notes.

The 1997 amendments to this section (enacted pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 98) were found unconstitutional by the Tennessee Supreme Court in Tennessee Municipal League v. Thompson, 958 S.W.2d 333 (Tenn. 1997). The provisions as set out above reflect the section as it appeared prior to the 1997 amendments.

Law Reviews.

Local Government Law — 1959 Tennessee Survey, 12 Vand. L. Rev. 1257 (1959).

6-30-107. [Unconstitutional.]

Code Commission Notes.

This section (enacted pursuant to Acts 1997, ch. 98) was found unconstitutional by the Tennessee Supreme Court in Tennessee Municipal League v. Thompson, 958 S.W.2d 333 (Tenn. 1997) and has been deleted by the code commission.

6-30-108. County of situs of newly incorporated municipality to continue to receive tax revenues until July 1 — Exception — Notice to department of revenue.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, whenever a new municipality incorporates under any form of charter, the county or counties in which the new municipality is located shall continue to receive the revenue from all state and local taxes distributed on the basis of situs of collection, generated within the newly incorporated area, until July 1 following the incorporation, unless the incorporation takes effect on July 1.

If the incorporation takes effect on July 1, then the municipality shall begin receiving revenue from such taxes generated within its corporate boundaries for the period beginning July 1.

Whenever a municipality incorporates, the municipality shall notify the department of revenue of such incorporation prior to the incorporation becoming effective for the purpose of tax administration.

Such taxes shall include the local sales tax authorized in § 67-6-103, the income tax on dividends authorized in § 67-2-102, and all other such taxes distributed to counties and municipalities based on the situs of their collection.

Acts 1998, ch. 651, § 3.